Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 8 Tastings

3-4-180.
[Repealed] Tastings of distilled spirits; definitions; general provisions; prohibited sales; administration.

History.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 682, § 1/HB 514; Ga. L. 2015, p. 317, § 6/SB 63; repealed by Ga. L. 2017, p. 406, § 5/SB 85, effective September 1, 2017.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 3(2)/SB 365, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, repealed the reservation of this Code section, effective May 8, 2018.